Tennessee, session 114, SB1607.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-116(c)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(A) Assault against a law enforcement officer or first responder under subsection
(a) is a Class E felony and shall be punished by a mandatory fine of ten thousand dollars
($10,000) and a mandatory minimum sentence of sixty (60) days incarceration. The
defendant is not eligible for release from confinement until the defendant has served the
entire sixty-day mandatory minimum sentence.
(B) Assault against a nurse under subsection (a) is a Class A misdemeanor and
shall be punished by a mandatory fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000) and a mandatory
minimum sentence of thirty (30) days incarceration. The defendant is not eligible for
release from confinement until the defendant has served the entire thirty-day mandatory
minimum sentence.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1607
008468
- 1 -